Massachusetts, session 194th, H2680.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 18Z the
following section:-
Section 18AA. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, all emergency
response vehicles shall be equipped with an emergency thermal blanket. For the purposes of this
section the term emergency response vehicle shall include, but not be limited to, a fire apparatus,
police vehicle, ambulance or disaster vehicle.
of 1